Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-687
Arrest or apprehension.

The procedures outlined in the Nebraska Rules of the Road shall apply only to apprehensions and arrests without a warrant for violations of the provisions of the rules and shall not exclude other lawful means of effecting such arrest or apprehension.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 109;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-6,109;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 183.